natural-language-processing/morphology_fun_with_foma/jp.foma
read lexc jp.lexc
def Lexicon ;

def TeU う "^" T E -> って || _ .#. ;
def TeTsu つ "^" T E -> って || _ .#. ;
def TeBu ぶ "^" T E -> んで || _ .#. ;
def TeMu む "^" T E -> んで || _ .#. ;
def TeNu ぬ "^" T E -> んで || _ .#. ;
def TeKu く "^" T E -> いて || _ .#. ;
def TeGu ぐ "^" T E -> いで || _ .#. ;
def TeSu す "^" T E -> して || _ .#. ;
def TeRu る "^" T E -> て || _ .#. ;

def TaU う "^" T A -> った || _ .#. ;
def TaTsu つ "^" T A -> った || _ .#. ;
def TaBu ぶ "^" T A -> んだ || _ .#. ;
def TaMu む "^" T A -> んだ || _ .#. ;
def TaNu ぬ "^" T A -> んだ || _ .#. ;
def TaKu く "^" T A -> いた || _ .#. ;
def TaGu ぐ "^" T A -> いだ || _ .#. ;
def TaSu す "^" T A -> した || _ .#. ;
def TaRu る "^" T A -> た || _ .#. ;

def TeJ い "^" T E -> くて || _ .#. ;
def TaJ い "^" T A -> かった || _ .#. ;

def All Lexicon .o. 
        TeU .o. 
        TeTsu .o. 
        TeBu .o. 
        TeMu .o. 
        TeNu .o. 
        TeKu .o. 
        TeGu .o.
        TeSu .o.
        TeRu .o.
        TaU .o. 
        TaTsu .o. 
        TaBu .o. 
        TaMu .o. 
        TaNu .o. 
        TaKu .o. 
        TaGu .o.
        TaSu .o.
        TaRu .o.
        TeJ .o.
        TaJ ;

regex All ;
